apertium-id-ms.id.metadix
    <pardef n="jika__cnjsub">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="namun__cnjadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="apa saja__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="apa[apa]__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-<prm/></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="berapa__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="mengapa__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="dari__pr">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="pr"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="yang__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="rel"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="adalah__part">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="part"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="dua__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="kedua/__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="berdua__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="coll"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="aduh__ij">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="ij"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="siapa saja"><i>siapa<b/>saja</i><par n="apa saja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mana saja"><i>mana<b/>saja</i><par n="apa saja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="di mana saja"><i>di<b/>mana<b/>saja</i><par n="apa saja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ke mana saja"><i>ke<b/>mana<b/>saja</i><par n="apa saja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kapan saja"><i>kapan<b/>saja</i><par n="apa saja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="apa pun"><i>apa<b/>pun</i><par n="apa saja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mana pun"><i>mana<b/>pun</i><par n="apa saja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ke mana pun"><i>ke<b/>mana<b/>pun</i><par n="apa saja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kapan pun"><i>kapan<b/>pun</i><par n="apa saja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="apapun"><i>apapun</i><par n="apa saja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="manapun"><i>manapun</i><par n="apa saja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ke manapun"><i>ke<b/>manapun</i><par n="apa saja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kapanpun"><i>kapanpun</i><par n="apa saja__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="apabila"><i>apabila</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="asal"><i>asal</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="bahwa"><i>bahwa</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="biar"><i>biar</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="hingga"><i>hingga</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="kalau-kalau"><i>kalau-kalau</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="kendatipun"><i>kendatipun</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="meski"><i>meski</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="padahal"><i>padahal</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="seandainya"><i>seandainya</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="sejak"><i>sejak</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="seolah-olah"><i>seolah-olah</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="supaya"><i>supaya</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="waktu"><i>waktu</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="bahkan"><i>bahkan</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="biarpun demikian"><i>biarpun<b/>demikian</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="demikianlah"><i>demikianlah</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="jadi"><i>jadi</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="maka dari itu"><i>maka<b/>dari<b/>itu</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="maka"><i>maka</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="makanya"><i>makanya</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="meskipun demikian"><i>meskipun<b/>demikian</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="misalnya"><i>misalnya</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="namun demikian"><i>namun<b/>demikian</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="namun"><i>namun</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="oleh karena itu"><i>oleh<b/>karena<b/>itu</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="sebaliknya"><i>sebaliknya</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="apa"><i>apa</i><par n="apa[apa]__prn" prm="apa"/></e>
    <e lm="siapa"><i>siapa</i><par n="apa[apa]__prn" prm="siapa"/></e>
    <e lm="mana"><i>mana</i><par n="apa[apa]__prn" prm="mana"/></e>
    <e lm="berapa"><i>berapa</i><par n="berapa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="bila"><i>bila</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bilamana"><i>bilamana</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dari mana"><i>dari<b/>mana</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="di mana"><i>di<b/>mana</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kapan"><i>kapan</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ke mana"><i>ke<b/>mana</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kenapa"><i>kenapa</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mengapa"><i>mengapa</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="apakah"><i>apakah</i><par n="berapa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="berapakah"><i>berapakah</i><par n="berapa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="manakah"><i>manakah</i><par n="berapa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="siapakah"><i>siapakah</i><par n="berapa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="bagaimanakah"><i>bagaimanakah</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bilakah"><i>bilakah</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dari manakah"><i>dari<b/>manakah</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kapankah"><i>kapankah</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kenapakah"><i>kenapakah</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bagaikan"><i>bagaikan</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dalam"><i>dalam</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="daripada"><i>daripada</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dengan"><i>dengan</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="karena"><i>karena</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kepada"><i>kepada</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="oleh"><i>oleh</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pada"><i>pada</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sebab"><i>sebab</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sebelum"><i>sebelum</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="selain"><i>selain</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="selepas"><i>selepas</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tanpa"><i>tanpa</i><par n="dari__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tiga"><i>tiga</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="lima"><i>lima</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tujuh"><i>tujuh</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sembilan"><i>sembilan</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sebelas"><i>sebelas</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="seribu"><i>seribu</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="separuh"><i>separuh</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sepertiga"><i>sepertiga</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="seperlima"><i>seperlima</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sepertujuh"><i>sepertujuh</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="perdua"><i>perdua</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="perenam"><i>perenam</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="persepuluh"><i>persepuluh</i><par n="dua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pertama"><i>pertama</i><par n="kedua/__num"/></e>
    <e lm="satu"><p><l>kesatu</l><r>satu</r></p><par n="kedua/__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dua"><p><l>kedua</l><r>dua</r></p><par n="kedua/__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tiga"><p><l>ketiga</l><r>tiga</r></p><par n="kedua/__num"/></e>
    <e lm="empat"><p><l>keempat</l><r>empat</r></p><par n="kedua/__num"/></e>
    <e lm="lima"><p><l>kelima</l><r>lima</r></p><par n="kedua/__num"/></e>
    <e lm="enam"><p><l>keenam</l><r>enam</r></p><par n="kedua/__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tujuh"><p><l>ketujuh</l><r>tujuh</r></p><par n="kedua/__num"/></e>
    <e lm="delapan"><p><l>kedelapan</l><r>delapan</r></p><par n="kedua/__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sembilan"><p><l>kesembilan</l><r>sembilan</r></p><par n="kedua/__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sepuluh"><p><l>kesepuluh</l><r>sepuluh</r></p><par n="kedua/__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dua"><p><l>berdua</l><r>dua</r></p><par n="berdua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tiga"><p><l>bertiga</l><r>tiga</r></p><par n="berdua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="empat"><p><l>berempat</l><r>empat</r></p><par n="berdua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="lima"><p><l>berlima</l><r>lima</r></p><par n="berdua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="enam"><p><l>berenam</l><r>enam</r></p><par n="berdua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tujuh"><p><l>bertujuh</l><r>tujuh</r></p><par n="berdua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="delapan"><p><l>berdelapan</l><r>delapan</r></p><par n="berdua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sembilan"><p><l>bersembilan</l><r>sembilan</r></p><par n="berdua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sepuluh"><p><l>bersepuluh</l><r>sepuluh</r></p><par n="berdua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ah"><i>ah</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="alhamdulillah"><i>alhamdulillah</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="astaga"><i>astaga</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="cih"><i>cih</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="cuh"><i>cuh</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="eh"><i>eh</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="halo"><i>halo</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hoi"><i>hoi</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hus"><i>hus</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nah"><i>nah</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="selamat pagi"><i>selamat<b/>pagi</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="selamat jalan"><i>selamat<b/>jalan</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="wah"><i>wah</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="yang"><i>yang</i><par n="yang__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="adalah"><i>adalah</i><par n="adalah__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ialah"><i>ialah</i><par n="adalah__part"/></e>
